Utah statutes.
17-50-321.   Implements of husbandry tracking debris onto county roads.
A county may not prohibit or punish the tracking of dirt, mud, or other debris
onto county roads resulting from the operation of an implement of husbandry if
the operation of the implement of husbandry is consistent with accepted
agricultural practices.
